New York, session 2025-2026, A9373.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The state finance law is amended by adding a new section 2 139-n to read as follows: 3 § 139-n. Statement in bids for the purchase of firearms, ammunition, 4 and firearm accessories. 1. (a) Every bid hereafter made to the state or 5 any public department or agency thereof, where competitive bidding is 6 required by statute, rule or regulation, for the purchase of firearms, 7 ammunition, or firearm accessories, shall contain the following state- 8 ment subscribed by the bidder and affirmed by such bidder as true under 9 the penalty of perjury: 10 "By submission of this bid, each bidder and each person signing on 11 behalf of any bidder certifies, and in the case of a joint bid each 12 party thereto certifies as to its own organization, under penalty of 13 perjury, that the bidder: 14 (i) is duly licensed pursuant to applicable federal, state, and local 15 law to sell or transfer firearms, ammunition, or firearm accessories, 16 where such licensure is required; 17 (ii) is in compliance with all applicable federal, state, and local 18 laws, rules, and regulations relating to the sale, transfer, storage, 19 and disposition of firearms, ammunition, and firearm accessories; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13949-02-6 A. 9373--A 2 1 (iii) does not sell, offer for sale, advertise, market, distribute, or 2 otherwise transfer unserialized gun build kits or firearm precursor 3 parts; 4 (iv) has and has implemented written policies, procedures, or prac- 5 tices to prevent, detect, and screen for straw purchases and firearm 6 trafficking; 7 (v) has and has implemented written policies, procedures, or practices 8 to prevent, detect, and screen against the sale or transfer of firearms, 9 ammunition, or firearm accessories to any individual prohibited from 10 possessing a firearm by federal, state, or local law or court order; 11 (vi) has and has implemented written policies, procedures, or prac- 12 tices to prevent, detect, document, and report the theft or loss of 13 firearms, ammunition, or firearm accessories; 14 (vii) provides training to employees regarding compliance with appli- 15 cable federal, state, and local laws, rules, and regulations relating to 16 the sale or transfer of firearms, ammunition, and firearm accessories; 17 and 18 (viii) operates a digital video surveillance system at each premises 19 where firearms, ammunition, or firearm accessories are sold, stored, or 20 transferred." 21 (b) Every bid hereafter made to the state or any public department or 22 agency thereof, where competitive bidding is not required by statute, 23 rule or regulation, for the purchase of firearms, ammunition, or firearm 24 accessories, may contain, at the discretion of the department, agency or 25 official, the certification required pursuant to paragraph (a) of this 26 subdivision. 27 2. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the statement required by paragraph 28 (a) of subdivision one of this section may be submitted electronically 29 in accordance with the provisions of subdivision seven of section one 30 hundred sixty-three of this chapter. 31 3. A bid shall not be considered for award, nor shall any award be 32 made to a bidder who has not complied with subdivision one of this 33 section; provided, however, that if the bidder cannot make the foregoing 34 certification, such bidder shall so state and shall furnish with the bid 35 a signed statement which sets forth in detail the reasons therefor. The 36 department, agency or official receiving such bid may request documenta- 37 tion, including inspection reports, notices of violation, or other 38 records, as may be necessary to verify any certification or signed 39 statement submitted pursuant to this section. 40 4. Any bid hereafter made to the state or any public department, agen- 41 cy or official thereof, by a corporate bidder for the purchase of 42 firearms, ammunition, or firearm accessories, where such bid contains 43 the statement required by subdivision one of this section, shall be 44 deemed to have been authorized by the board of directors of such bidder, 45 and such authorization shall be deemed to include the signing and 46 submission of such bid and the inclusion therein of such statement as 47 the act and deed of the corporation. 48 § 2. This act shall take effect April 1, 2027.